Utah statutes.
9-17-102.   Humanitarian Service and Educational and Cultural Exchange Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created in the General Fund a restricted account known as the "Humanitarian Service and Educational and Cultural Exchange Restricted Account."

(2)  The account shall be funded by:

(a)  contributions deposited into the account in accordance with Section 41-1a-422;

(b)  private contributions; and

(c)  donations or grants from public or private entities.

(3)  Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the department shall distribute funds in the account to one or more charitable organizations that:

(a)  qualify as being tax exempt under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code;

(b)  have a national parent organization which:

(i)  provides international humanitarian service projects; and

(ii)  has youth programs including programs to foster leadership in high school students, humanitarian service in high school and college, and conducts and promotes community service projects;

(c)  have a non-profit youth exchange program that does not compensate those who administer the program within the state;

(d)  have an annual leadership conference, which does not compensate those who administer the program within the state;

(e)  have high school service clubs, which promote humanitarian services on a state level, a national level, and an international level; and

(f)  have college service clubs, which promote humanitarian service on a state level, a national level, and an international level.

(4) (a)  An organization described in Subsection (3) may apply to the department to receive a distribution in accordance with Subsection (3).

(b)  An organization that receives a distribution from the department in accordance with Subsection (3) shall expend the distribution only to:

(i)  pay the costs of supporting the following programs within the state:

(A)  youth programs including programs to foster leadership in high school students and humanitarian service in high school and college;

(B)  community service projects;

(C)  a non-profit youth exchange program;

(D)  an annual leadership conference;

(E)  high school service clubs, which promote humanitarian service on a state level, a national level, and an international level; and

(F)  college service clubs, which promote humanitarian service on a state level, a national level, and an international level; and

(ii)  pay the costs of issuing or reordering Humanitarian Service and Educational and Cultural Exchange support special group license plate decals.

(c)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department may make rules providing procedures for an organization to apply to the department to receive a distribution under Subsection (3).



Amended by Chapter 303, 2011 General Session

